Maine, session 132, LD896.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-G, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Continuous coverage of children under 6 years of age. Upon the approval of the
federal Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, the department shall adopt rules to establish the continuous eligibility of a child
from birth through 5 years of age. A child who is eligible for and enrolls in Medicaid or the
Children's Health Insurance Program established in section 3174-T is eligible to receive
continuous coverage through Medicaid or the Children's Health Insurance Program,
regardless of the family's change in income. Continuous eligibility must be maintained
through the end of the month in which the child attains 6 years of age.
A child's eligibility to receive continuous coverage under this subsection must be
redetermined or terminated if:
A. The child is no longer a resident of the State;
B. The child's parent or legal guardian requests termination of the child's eligibility;
C. The child dies; or
D. The department determines that the child's eligibility was erroneously granted at
the most recent determination, redetermination or renewal of eligibility because of
agency error, fraud, abuse or perjury.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Department to apply for federal approval. The Department of Health
and Human Services shall, by December 31, 2025, apply to the federal Department of
Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a waiver or
demonstration project or to amend a pending or current waiver or demonstration project to
provide continuous eligibility for a child from birth through 5 years of age who is eligible
for and enrolls in the MaineCare program.